Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 6 REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY LAW
43-4-605. Powers of the authority - inclusion or exclusion of property - determination of regional transportation system alignment - fund created - repeal.

In addition to any other powers granted to an authority pursuant to this part 6, an authority has the following powers:

To have perpetual existence, except as otherwise provided in the contract;

To sue and be sued;

To enter into contracts and agreements affecting the affairs of the authority;

To establish, collect, and, from time to time, increase or decrease fees, tolls, rates, and charges for the privilege of traveling on or using any property included in any regional transportation system financed, constructed, operated, or maintained by the authority, without the fees, tolls, rates, and charges being subject to any supervision or regulation by any board, agency, bureau, commission, or official; except that any fees, tolls, rates, and charges imposed for the use of any regional transportation system shall be fixed and adjusted so that the fees, tolls, rates, and charges collected, along with other revenues, if any, are at least sufficient to pay for any bonds issued pursuant to this part 6 and interest thereon;

To pledge all or any portion of the revenues to the payment of bonds of the authority;

To finance, construct, operate, or maintain regional transportation systems within or without the boundaries of the authority; except that the authority shall not construct regional transportation systems in any territory located outside the boundaries of the authority and within the boundaries of a municipality as the boundaries of the municipality exist on the date the authority is created without the consent of the governing body of the municipality; outside the boundaries of the authority and within the unincorporated boundaries of a county as the unincorporated boundaries of the county exist on the date the authority is created without the consent of the governing body of the county; or inside or outside the boundaries of the authority if the regional transportation systems would alter the state highway system, as defined in section 43-2-101 (1), or the interstate system, as defined in section 43-2-101 (2), except as authorized by an intergovernmental agreement entered into by the members of the combination that created the authority or the transportation planning organization exercising the powers of an authority and the department of transportation as required by section 43-4-603 (1.5);

To purchase, trade, exchange, acquire, buy, sell, lease, lease with an option to purchase, dispose of, and encumber real or personal property and any interest therein, including easements and rights-of-way;

To accept real or personal property for the use of the authority and to accept gifts and conveyances upon the terms and conditions as the board may approve;

To impose an annual motor vehicle registration fee of not more than ten dollars for each motor vehicle registered with the authorized agent, as defined in section 42-1-102, of the county by persons residing in all or any designated portion of the members of the combination or of the members of the transportation planning organization exercising the powers of an authority as authorized by section 43-4-622; except that the authority shall not impose a motor vehicle registration fee with respect to motor vehicles registered to persons residing outside the boundaries of the authority and within the boundaries of a municipality as the boundaries of the municipality exist on the date the authority is created or the resolution authorizing the transportation planning organization to exercise the powers of an authority is adopted without the consent of the governing body of the municipality or outside the boundaries of the authority and within the unincorporated boundaries of a county as the unincorporated boundaries of the county exist on the date the authority is created without the consent of the governing body of the county. The registration fee is in addition to any fee or tax imposed by the state or any other governmental unit. If a motor vehicle is registered in a county that is a member of more than one authority, the total of all fees imposed pursuant to this subsection (1)(i) for the motor vehicle shall not exceed ten dollars. The authorized agent of the county in which the registration fee is imposed shall collect the fee and remit the fee to the authority. The authority shall apply the registration fees solely to the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of regional transportation systems that are consistent with the expenditures specified in section 18 of article X of the state constitution.

Subject to the provisions of section 43-4-612, to impose, in all or any designated portion of the members of the combination or of the members of the transportation planning organization exercising the powers of an authority as authorized by section 43-4-622, a visitor benefit tax on persons who purchase overnight rooms or accommodations in any amount that would not cause the aggregate amount of the visitor benefit tax and any lodging tax imposed on such overnight rooms or accommodations to exceed two percent of the price of such overnight rooms or accommodations; except that the authority shall not impose a visitor benefit tax on overnight rooms or accommodations that are in any territory:

Outside the boundaries of the authority and within the boundaries of a municipality as the boundaries of the municipality exist on the date the authority is created without the consent of the governing body of such municipality; or

Outside the boundaries of the authority and within the unincorporated boundaries of a county as the unincorporated boundaries of the county exist on the date the authority is created without the consent of the governing body of such county.

The visitor benefit tax is in addition to any fee or tax imposed by the state or any other governmental unit and a minimum of seventy-five percent of the net revenue derived from the tax shall be used by the authority solely to finance, construct, operate, and maintain regional transportation systems and provide incentives to overnight visitors to use public transportation.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (i.5), an authority may derive no more than one third of its total revenues from the visitor benefit tax.

Any authority that imposes a visitor benefit tax shall give due consideration to the transportation needs of persons who pay the visitor benefit tax on the purchase of overnight rooms or accommodations when constructing, operating, and maintaining regional transportation systems and shall ensure that such visitors have easy access to the regional transportation systems.

Upon the request of the authority, the executive director of the department of revenue shall administer and collect the visitor benefit tax authorized by subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (i.5). If the authority requests that the executive director administer and collect the tax, the executive director shall make monthly distributions of the tax collections to the authority. The department of revenue shall retain an amount not to exceed the cost of the collection, administration, and enforcement and shall transmit the amount to the state treasurer who shall credit the same to the regional transportation authority visitor benefit tax fund, which fund is hereby created. The amounts so retained are hereby appropriated annually from the fund to the department to the extent necessary for the department's collection, administration, and enforcement of the provisions of this part 6. Any moneys remaining in the fund attributable to taxes collected in the prior fiscal year shall be transmitted to the authority; except that, prior to the transmission to the authority of such moneys, any moneys appropriated from the general fund to the department for the collection, administration, and enforcement of the tax for the prior fiscal year shall be repaid.

Subject to the provisions of section 43-4-612, to levy, in all or any designated portion of the members of the combination or of the members of the transportation planning organization exercising the powers of an authority as authorized by section 43-4-622, a sales or use tax, or both, at a rate not to exceed one percent upon every transaction or other incident with respect to which a sales or use tax is levied by the state; except that, if the authority includes territory that is within the regional transportation district created and existing pursuant to article 9 of title 32, a designated portion of the members of the combination or of the members of the transportation planning organization in which a new tax is levied must be composed of entire territories of members of the combination or of the members of the transportation planning organization so that the rate of tax imposed pursuant to this part 6 within the territory of any single member of the combination or of the members of the transportation planning organization is uniform and except that the authority shall not levy a sales or use tax on any transaction or other incident occurring in any territory located outside the boundaries of the authority and within the boundaries of a municipality as the boundaries of the municipality exist on the date the authority is created without the consent of the governing body of the municipality or outside the boundaries of the authority and within the unincorporated boundaries of a county as the unincorporated boundaries exist on the date the authority is created without the consent of the governing body of the county. Subject to the provisions of section 43-4-612, the authority may elect to levy any such sales or use tax at different rates in different designated portions of the members of the combination or of the members of the transportation planning organization; except that, if the authority includes territory that is within the regional transportation district, a designated portion of the members of the combination or of the members of the transportation planning organization in which a new tax is levied must be composed of entire territories of members of the combination or of the members of the transportation planning organization so that the rate of tax imposed pursuant to this part 6 within the territory of any single member of the combination or of the transportation planning organization is uniform. If the authority so elects, it shall submit a single ballot question that lists all of the different rates to the registered electors of all designated portions of the members of the combination or of the transportation planning organization in which the proposed sales or use tax is to be levied. The tax imposed pursuant to this subsection (1)(j) is in addition to any other sales or use tax imposed pursuant to law. If a member of the combination or of the transportation planning organization is located within more than one authority, the sales or use tax, or both, authorized by this subsection (1)(j) shall not exceed one percent upon every transaction or other incident with respect to which a sales or use tax is levied by the state. The executive director of the department of revenue shall collect, administer, and enforce the sales or use tax, to the extent feasible, in the manner provided in section 29-2-106. The director shall make monthly distributions of the tax collections to the authority, which shall apply the proceeds solely to the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of regional transportation systems. The department shall retain an amount not to exceed the total cost of the collection, administration, and enforcement and shall transmit the amount to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the regional transportation authority sales tax fund, which fund is hereby created. The amounts so retained are hereby appropriated annually from the fund to the department to the extent necessary for the department's collection, administration, and enforcement of this part 6. Any money remaining in the fund attributable to taxes collected in the prior fiscal year shall be transmitted to the authority; except that, prior to the transmission to the authority of such money, any money appropriated from the general fund to the department for the collection, administration, and enforcement of the tax for the prior fiscal year shall be repaid.

A sales or use tax, or both, levied pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (j) shall not be levied on the sale of tangible personal property:

Delivered by a retailer or a retailer's agent or to a common carrier for delivery to a destination outside the authority;

Upon which specific ownership tax has been paid or is payable if the purchaser resides outside the boundaries of the authority or the purchaser's principal place of business is outside the boundaries of the authority and if the personal property is registered or required to be registered outside the boundaries of the authority; or

Where such tangible personal property is a cigarette.

Subject to the provisions of section 43-4-612, to impose a uniform mill levy of up to five mills on all taxable property within the territory of the authority. This subsection (1)(j.5) does not limit or affect the power of an authority to establish local improvement districts and impose special assessments as authorized by section 43-4-608.

This subsection (1)(j.5) is repealed, effective January 1, 2029.

To have and exercise all rights and powers necessary or incidental to or implied from the specific powers granted by this part 6. The specific powers shall not be considered as a limitation upon any power necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and intent of this part 6.

The board may include property within or exclude property from the boundaries of the authority in the manner provided in this subsection (2). Property may not be included within the boundaries of the authority unless it is within the boundaries of the members of the combination or of the transportation planning organization exercising the powers of an authority as authorized by section 43-4-622 at the time of the inclusion. Property located within the boundaries of a municipality that is not a member of the combination or of the transportation planning organization as the boundaries of the municipality exist on the date the property is included may not be included without the consent of the governing body of the municipality, and property within the unincorporated boundaries of a county that is not a member of the combination or of the transportation planning organization as the unincorporated boundaries of the county exist on the date the property is included may not be included without the consent of the governing body of the county.

Prior to any inclusion in or exclusion of property from the boundaries of the authority, the board shall cause notice of the proposed inclusion or exclusion to be published in a newspaper of general circulation within the boundaries of the authority and cause the notice to be mailed to the division, to the transportation commission, and to the owners of property to be included or excluded at the last-known address described for the owners in the real estate records of the county in which the property is located. The notice shall describe the property to be included in or excluded from the boundaries of the authority, shall specify the date, time, and place at which the board shall hold a public hearing on the proposed inclusion or exclusion, and shall state that persons having objections to the inclusion or exclusion may appear at the public hearing to object to the proposed inclusion or exclusion. The date of the public hearing contained in the notice shall be not less than twenty days after the mailing and publication of the notice. The board, at the time and place designated in the notice or at such times and places to which the hearing may be adjourned, shall hear all objections to the proposed inclusion or exclusion.

The board, upon the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the directors of the board, may adopt a resolution including or excluding all or any portion of the property described in the notice. Upon the adoption of the resolution, the property shall be included within or excluded from the boundaries of the authority as set forth in the resolution. The board may adopt the resolution without amending the contract required by section 43-4-603 (2). The board shall file the resolution with the director of the division, who shall cause the resolution to be recorded in the real estate records of each county having territory included in the boundaries of the authority.

All property excluded from the authority shall thereafter be subject to the revenue-raising powers of the authority only to the extent that the powers have been exercised by the authority against the property or activities occurring on the property prior to the exclusion and to the extent required to comply with agreements with the holders of bonds outstanding at the time of the exclusion. All property or activities occurring on the property included within the authority shall thereafter be subject to the revenue-raising powers of the authority. In no way will this section affect or increase property taxes in the affected territory or jurisdiction.

Property included in an authority pursuant to this section is subject to the same mill levies and other taxes levied or to be levied on other similarly situated property at the time the additional property is included. The newly included property is an addition to taxable real property, and the application of such levies and other taxes to the newly included property is not subject to the requirements of section 20 (4) of article X of the state constitution. This subsection (3) is intended to place newly included property and similarly situated existing property within an authority on an equal basis.

The board, upon the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the directors of the board, may determine the location of the regional transportation system.

Any regional transportation system constructed by an authority under this part 6 that is funded, in whole or in part, from the highway users tax fund and that may be reasonably expected to exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars in the aggregate for any fiscal year shall be subject to the construction bidding provisions in part 7 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S. If the state is involved in the construction of the regional transportation system, the construction bidding provisions in article 92 of title 24, C.R.S., shall apply. Nothing herein shall be construed to affect the ability of such entities to enter into design-build contracts under applicable state laws.

In exercising any of the powers to impose taxes pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, an authority shall, whenever possible, assess any such tax within the boundaries of existing taxing districts in order to reduce the administrative costs of the department of revenue.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 485, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2000:

(1)(i.5) added and (1)(j) and (2)(a) amended, p. 1175, § 3, effective August 2.

L. 2005:

(1)(d), (1)(f), (1)(i), (1)(i.5)(II), (1)(i.5)(IV), (1)(i.5)(V), (1)(j), (4), and (5) amended, p. 1061, § 5, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2007:

(1)(j)(I) amended, p. 978, § 1, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2008:

(1)(j)(I) amended, p. 993, § 16, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(1)(j)(II) amended, (HB 09-1342), ch. 354, p. 1851, § 16, effective July 1; (1)(j.5) added, (HB 09-1034), ch. 127, p. 548, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

(1)(i) amended, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 376, § 33, effective August 9; (1)(j.5) amended, (HB 17-1018), ch. 2, p. 3, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

IP(1), (1)(f), (1)(i), IP(1)(i.5)(I), (1)(j)(I), and (2)(a) amended, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1433, § 39, effective June 17.

L. 2022:

(1)(i) amended, (SB 22-141), ch. 81, p. 399, § 2, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2005 act amending subsections (1)(d), (1)(f), (1)(i), (1)(i.5)(II), (1)(i.5)(IV), (1)(i.5)(V), (1)(j), (4), and (5), see section 1 of chapter 269, Session Laws of Colorado 2005. For the legislative declaration in SB 21-260, see section 1 of chapter 250, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

43-4-605.5. Preservation of state highway funding - legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that moneys made available for regional transportation systems pursuant to this part 6 shall not be used to supplant existing or budgeted department of transportation funding of any portion of the state highway system within the territory of any authority or any transportation planning region, as defined in section 43-1-1102 (8), that includes any portion of the territory of the authority except as described in detail in an intergovernmental agreement entered into pursuant to section 43-4-603 (1.5).

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 1064, § 6, effective January 1, 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2005 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 269, Session Laws of Colorado 2005.

43-4-606. Establishment of regional transportation activity enterprises.

Any authority may establish regional transportation activity enterprises for the purpose of pursuing or continuing activities authorized by this part 6. Any regional transportation activity enterprise established or maintained pursuant to this part 6 is not subject to the provisions of section 20 of article X of the state constitution.

Each regional transportation activity enterprise shall be wholly owned by a single authority and shall not be combined with any regional transportation activity enterprise owned by another authority; except that each authority may establish more than one regional transportation activity enterprise and each regional transportation activity enterprise may conduct or continue to conduct one or more activities authorized by this part 6 as may be determined by the governing body of the regional transportation activity enterprise.

This subsection (2) does not limit the authority of a regional transportation activity enterprise to contract with any other person or entity, including other authorities, other state or local governments, or other regional transportation activity enterprises.

The governing body of a regional transportation activity enterprise is the board of the authority that owns the enterprise.

The governing body for each regional transportation activity enterprise may exercise the authority's legal authority relating to activities authorized by this part 6, but no regional transportation activity enterprise may levy a tax that is subject to the requirements of section 20 (4) of article X of the state constitution.

Each regional transportation activity enterprise, through its governing body, may issue or reissue revenue bonds in accordance with the provisions of section 43-4-609. Each bond issued under this subsection (5) shall recite in substance that the bond, including the interest thereon, is payable from the revenues and other available funds of the regional transportation activity enterprise pledged for the payment thereof.

The powers provided in this section for regional transportation activity enterprises shall not modify, limit, or affect the powers conferred by any other law, either directly or indirectly.

Loan agreements subject to repayment or contracts to provide regional transportation systems or the use of property included in or in connection with a regional transportation system, which involve the payment of funds for such systems or the use of the property to an authority or its regional transportation activity enterprise by a state or local government or by another authority or regional transportation activity enterprise, are not grants for purposes of the definition of enterprise under section 20 (2)(d) of article X of the state constitution.

An authority or its regional transportation activity enterprise may contract with any other governmental or private source of funding for loans and grants related to regional transportation activity enterprise functions.

Revenues collected or spent by an authority for regional transportation systems or the use of property included in or in connection with a regional transportation system rendered or provided by a regional transportation activity enterprise owned by the authority are not subject to the provisions of section 20 (4) and (7) of article X of the state constitution.

The rates or a change in the rates charged by an authority for regional transportation systems or for the use of property included in or in connection with a regional transportation system rendered or provided by a regional transportation activity enterprise owned by the authority are not taxes subject to the provisions of section 20 (4) and (7) of article X of the state constitution.

The authority granted to a regional transportation activity enterprise under this section is in addition to all other authority provided by law. Nothing contained in this part 6 shall be construed to require the establishment, operation, or continuation of a regional transportation activity enterprise or to limit the authority of any state or local government to utilize other policies and procedures for establishing, operating, or continuing any enterprise for any lawful purpose.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 489, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1064, § 7, effective January 1, 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2005 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 269, Session Laws of Colorado 2005.

43-4-607. Traffic laws - toll collection.

The traffic laws of this state and of any municipality, in which a regional transportation system is constructed, operated, or maintained by an authority, and the authority's rules regarding toll collection and enforcement shall pertain to and govern the use of any regional transportation system on which vehicles subject to the traffic laws or rules are operated. State and local law enforcement authorities are authorized to enter into traffic and toll enforcement agreements with authorities. Any funds received by a state law enforcement authority pursuant to the toll enforcement agreement are subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly to the law enforcement authority for the purpose of performing its duties pursuant to the agreement.

Any person who fails to pay a required fee, toll, rate, or charge for the privilege of traveling on or using any property included in a regional transportation system pursuant to this part 6 is subject to the penalty specified in sections 42-4-613 and 42-4-1701 (4)(a)(I)(G), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 491, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1066, § 8, effective January 1, 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2005 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 269, Session Laws of Colorado 2005.

43-4-607.5. Streetscape enhancements - local and private authority.

A local government whose jurisdiction includes territory within an authority may create, permit, or contract streetscape enhancements within that territory.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 1064, § 6, effective January 1, 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2005 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 269, Session Laws of Colorado 2005.

43-4-608. Local improvement districts.

The board, or the board of the regional transportation district established under article 9 of title 32, C.R.S., in the case of any authority whose territory is located in whole or in part within the boundaries of the district, may establish local improvement districts within the boundaries of the authority to facilitate the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of regional transportation systems. The board may establish local improvement districts whenever any area within the boundaries of the authority, in the opinion of the board, will be especially benefited by the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of a regional transportation system. The board shall not establish a local improvement district unless the board receives a petition signed by the owners of the property that will bear a majority of the proposed assessments and a petition signed by the lesser of a majority of the registered electorate in the proposed district or one thousand registered electors in the proposed district. The method of creating local improvement districts, making the improvements, and assessing the costs thereof shall be as provided in part 6 of article 20 of title 30, C.R.S.; except that the board shall perform the duties of the board of county commissioners thereunder and the improvements shall be regional transportation systems as defined by section 43-4-602 (16).

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 491, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1066, § 9, effective January 1, 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2005 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 269, Session Laws of Colorado 2005.

43-4-609. Bonds.

The authority may, from time to time, issue bonds for any of its corporate purposes. The authority shall issue the bonds pursuant to resolution of the board, and the bonds shall be payable solely out of all or a specified portion of the revenues as designated by the board.

As provided in the resolution of the board under which the bonds are authorized to be issued or as provided in a trust indenture between the authority and any commercial bank or trust company having full trust powers, the bonds may:

Be executed and delivered by the authority at such times;

Be in such form and denominations and include such terms and maturities;

Be subject to optional or mandatory redemption prior to maturity with or without a premium;

Be in fully registered form or bearer form registrable as to principal or interest or both;

Bear such conversion privileges;

Be payable in such installments and at such times not exceeding forty years from the date thereof;

Be payable at such place or places whether within or without the state;

Bear interest at such rate or rates per annum, which may be fixed or vary according to index, procedure, or formula or as determined by the authority or its agents, without regard to any interest rate limitation appearing in any other law of the state;

Be subject to purchase at the option of the holder or the authority and be evidenced in such manner;

Be executed by the officers of the authority, including the use of one or more facsimile signatures so long as at least one manual signature appears on the bonds, which signatures may be either of an officer of the authority or of an agent authenticating the same;

Be in the form of coupon bonds that have attached interest coupons bearing a manual or facsimile signature of an officer of the authority; and

Contain such provisions not inconsistent with this part 6.

The bonds may be sold at public or private sale at such price or prices, in such manner, and at such times as determined by the board, and the board may pay all fees, expenses, and commissions that it deems necessary or advantageous in connection with the sale of the bonds. The power to fix the date of sale of the bonds, to receive bids or proposals, to award and sell bonds, to fix interest rates, and to take all other action necessary to sell and deliver the bonds may be delegated to an officer or agent of the authority. Any outstanding bonds may be refunded by the authority pursuant to article 56 of title 11, C.R.S. All bonds and any interest coupons applicable thereto are declared to be negotiable instruments.

The resolution or trust indenture authorizing the issuance of the bonds may pledge all or a portion of the revenues of the authority, may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of holders of any of the bonds as the authority deems appropriate, may set forth the rights and remedies of the holders of any of the bonds, and may contain provisions that the authority deems appropriate for the security of the holders of the bonds, including, but not limited to, provisions for letters of credit, insurance, standby credit agreements, or other forms of credit ensuring timely payment of the bonds, including the redemption price or the purchase price.

Any pledge of revenues or property made by the authority or by any person or governmental unit with which the authority contracts shall be valid and binding from the time the pledge is made. The revenues or property so pledged shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery or further act, and the lien of the pledge shall be valid and binding against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the pledging party, irrespective of whether such claiming party has notice of such lien. The instrument by which the pledge is created need not be recorded or filed.

Neither the directors of the board, employees of the authority, or any person executing the bonds shall be liable personally on the bonds or subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.

The authority may purchase its bonds out of any available funds and may hold, pledge, cancel, or resell the bonds subject to and in accordance with agreements with the holders thereof.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 492, § 1, effective August 6.

43-4-610. Cooperative powers.

The authority has the power to cooperate with any person:

To accept contributions, loans, advances, or liens securing obligations to or of the authority from any person with respect to the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of a regional transportation system and, in connection with any loan or advance, to enter into contracts establishing the repayment terms;

To enter into contracts with respect to and to cooperate in the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of a specified regional transportation system;

To enter into joint operating contracts concerning a regional transportation system;

To acquire easements or rights-of-way for a regional transportation system;

To transfer dominion over all or any portion of a regional transportation system financed, constructed, operated, or maintained by the authority to the federal government, the state government, other governmental units, or any person; and

To designate a regional transportation system as part of the federal highway system, the state highway system, a county highway system, or a municipal highway system if the person with jurisdiction over the applicable highway system consents to the designation.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 494, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1066, § 10, effective January 1, 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2005 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 269, Session Laws of Colorado 2005.

43-4-611. Powers of governmental units.

A governmental unit, for the purpose of aiding and cooperating in the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of any regional transportation system, has the power:

To sell, lease, loan, donate, grant, convey, assign, transfer, and otherwise dispose to the authority any real or personal property or interests therein;

To enter into agreements with any person for the joint financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of any regional transportation system. Upon compliance with applicable constitutional or charter limitations, the governmental unit may agree to make payments, without limitation as to amount except as set forth in the agreement, from revenues received from one or more fiscal years, to the authority or any person to defray the costs of the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of a regional transportation system.

To transfer or assign to the authority any contracts that may have been awarded by the governmental unit for construction, operation, or maintenance of any regional transportation system.

To assist in the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of a regional transportation system, any county, municipality, or special district that is a member of a combination or of a transportation planning organization exercising the powers of an authority as authorized by section 43-4-622 may, by contract, pledge to the authority all or a portion of the revenues it receives from the highway users tax fund or from any other legally available funds. The authority shall apply revenues that it receives pursuant to the pledge to the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of any regional transportation system. The authority may refuse to accept any revenues that would cause a member of the combination or of the transportation planning organization to exceed its allowable fiscal year spending under section 20 of article X of the state constitution and that could result in a refund of excess revenues under said section 20.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 494, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1067, § 11, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2010:

(2) amended, (HB 10-1243), ch. 385, p. 1805, § 5, effective August 11.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1436, § 40, effective June 17.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2005 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 269, Session Laws of Colorado 2005. For the legislative declaration in SB 21-260, see section 1 of chapter 250, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.